Missouri, session 2026, HB2577.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 163.191, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 163.191, to read as follows:
163.191. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Community college"[,]:
(a) An institution of higher education deriving financial resources from local, state,
and federal sources, and providing postsecondary education primarily for persons above the
twelfth grade age level, including courses in:
[(a)] a. Liberal arts and sciences, including general education;
[(b)] b. Occupational, vocational-technical; and
[(c)] c. A variety of educational community services.
(b) a. Community college course offerings shall generally lead to the granting of
certificates, diplomas, or associate degrees, and may include baccalaureate degrees only when
authorized by the coordinating board for higher education in circumstances where:
(i) There exists a persistent workforce shortage in occupations requiring a
baccalaureate degree;
(ii) The level of education required in a field for accreditation or licensure increases
to the baccalaureate degree level; or[,]
(iii) In the case of applied bachelor's degrees, the level of education required for
employment in a field increases to that level, and when doing so would not unnecessarily
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2577 2
duplicate an existing program[, collaboration with a university is not feasible or the approach
is not a viable means of meeting the needs of students and employers,] and the institution has
the academic and financial capacity to offer the program in a high-quality manner.
b. Quality for such baccalaureate degree programs shall be evaluated at least in part
by the delivery of upper-level coursework or competencies, and defined by accreditation or
compliance with the Higher Learning Commission standards for bachelor's degrees;
(2) "Operating costs", all costs attributable to current operations, including all direct
costs of instruction, instructors' and counselors' compensation, administrative costs, all
normal operating costs and all similar noncapital expenditures during any year, excluding
costs of construction of facilities and the purchase of equipment, furniture, and other capital
items authorized and funded in accordance with subsection 6 of this section. Operating costs
shall be computed in accordance with accounting methods and procedures to be specified by
the department of higher education and workforce development;
(3) "Workforce shortage", a determination by the Missouri economic research
and information center (MERIC) that there are more job vacancies in the labor market
than available workers in a specified industry;
(4) "Year", from July first to June thirtieth of the following year.
2. Each year public community colleges in the aggregate shall be eligible to receive
from state funds, if state funds are available and appropriated, an amount up to but not more
than fifty percent of the state community colleges' planned operating costs as determined by
the department of higher education and workforce development. The department of higher
education and workforce development shall review all institutional budget requests and
prepare appropriation recommendations annually for the community colleges under the
supervision of the department. The department's budget request shall include a recommended
level of funding.
3. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, distribution of
appropriated funds to community college districts shall be in accordance with the community
college resource allocation model. This model shall be developed and revised as appropriate
cooperatively by the community colleges and the department of higher education and
workforce development. The department of higher education and workforce development
shall recommend the model to the coordinating board for higher education for their approval.
The core funding level for each community college shall initially be established at an amount
agreed upon by the community colleges and the department of higher education and
workforce development. This amount will be adjusted annually for inflation, limited growth,
and program improvements in accordance with the resource allocation model starting with
fiscal year 1993.

HB 2577 3
(2) Unless the general assembly chooses to otherwise appropriate state funding,
beginning in fiscal year 2016, at least ninety percent of any increase in core funding over the
appropriated amount for the previous fiscal year shall be distributed in accordance with the
achievement of performance-funding measures under section 173.1006.
4. The department of higher education and workforce development shall be
responsible for evaluating the effectiveness of the resource allocation model and shall submit
a report to the governor, the joint committee on education, the speaker of the house of
representatives and president pro tempore of the senate by October 31, 2019, and every four
years thereafter.
5. The department of higher education and workforce development shall request new
and separate state aid funds for any new community college district for its first six years of
operation. The request for the new district shall be based upon the same level of funding
being provided to the existing districts, and should be sufficient to provide for the growth
required to reach a mature enrollment level.
6. In addition to state funds received for operating purposes, each community college
district shall be eligible to receive an annual appropriation, exclusive of any capital
appropriations, for the cost of maintenance and repair of facilities and grounds, including
surface parking areas, and purchases of equipment and furniture. Such funds shall not exceed
in any year an amount equal to ten percent of the state appropriations, exclusive of any capital
appropriations, to community college districts for operating purposes during the most recently
completed fiscal year. The department of higher education and workforce development may
include in its annual appropriations request the necessary funds to implement the provisions
of this subsection and when appropriated shall distribute the funds to each community college
district as appropriated. The department of higher education and workforce development
appropriations request shall be for specific maintenance, repair, and equipment projects at
specific community college districts, shall be in an amount of fifty percent of the cost of a
given project as determined by the coordinating board and shall be only for projects which
have been approved by the coordinating board through a process of application, evaluation,
and approval as established by the coordinating board. The coordinating board, as part of its
process of application, evaluation, and approval, shall require the community college district
to provide proof that the fifty-percent share of funding to be defrayed by the district is either
on hand or committed for maintenance, repair, and equipment projects. Only salaries or
portions of salaries paid which are directly related to approved projects may be used as a part
of the fifty-percent share of funding.
7. School districts offering two-year college courses pursuant to section 178.370 on
October 31, 1961, shall receive state aid pursuant to subsection 2, subdivision (1) of

HB 2577 4
subsection 3, and subsection 6 of this section if all scholastic standards established pursuant
to sections 178.770 to 178.890 are met.
8. In order to make postsecondary educational opportunities available to Missouri
residents who do not reside in an existing community college district, community colleges
organized pursuant to section 178.370 or sections 178.770 to 178.890 shall be authorized
pursuant to the funding provisions of this section to offer courses and programs outside the
community college district with prior approval by the coordinating board for higher
education. The classes conducted outside the district shall be self-sustaining except that the
coordinating board shall promulgate rules to reimburse selected out-of-district instruction
only where prior need has been established in geographical areas designated by the
100 coordinating board for higher education. Funding for such off-campus instruction shall be
101 included in the appropriation recommendations, shall be determined by the general assembly
102 and shall continue, within the amounts appropriated therefor, unless the general assembly
103 disapproves the action by concurrent resolution.
104 9. When distributing state aid authorized for community colleges, the state treasurer
105 may, in any year if requested by a community college, disregard the provision in section
106 30.180 requiring the state treasurer to convert the warrant requesting payment into a check or
107 draft and wire transfer the amount to be distributed to the community college directly to the
108 community college's designated deposit for credit to the community college's account.
✔